Louisiana, session 2026, HB191.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 880(F) and (G) are hereby enacted
to read as follows:
Art. 880. Credit for prior custody; limitations
* * *
F. A defendant shall not receive overlapping jail credit when consecutive
sentences are imposed for multiple counts or charges, regardless if the sentence
imposed is subsequently corrected pursuant to Article 881.5. Credit for time spent
in actual custody shall be applied to only one of the consecutive sentences imposed.
G. Any overlapping jail credit that is awarded in violation of this Article is
null, void, and of no effect.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.